Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB165.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 157.320 is amended to read as follows:
As used in KRS 157.310 to 157.440, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Administrative regulations of the Kentucky Board of Education" means those
regulations which the Kentucky Board of Education may adopt upon the
recommendation and with the advice of the commissioner of education. The
commissioner of education shall recommend administrative regulations necessary
for carrying out the purposes of KRS 157.310 to 157.440;
(2) "Average daily attendance" means the aggregate days attended by pupils in a public
school, adjusted for weather-related low attendance days if applicable, divided by
the actual number of days the school is in session, after the five (5) days with the
lowest attendance have been deducted.
(a) Aggregate days shall include, in addition to the aggregate number of days
attended by a pupil who was suspended during a school year, the number of
days the pupil was suspended, not to exceed ten (10) days in total for the
school year; and
(b) Aggregate days shall include, in addition to the aggregate number of days
attended by a pupil who was expelled for behavioral problems, the number of
days the pupil was expelled up to a total of one hundred seventy-five (175)
days. This total may extend into the next school year and shall be counted in
the average daily attendance for the next year;
(3) "Base funding level" means a guaranteed amount of revenue per pupil to be
provided for each school district, to be used for regular operating and capital
expenditures;
(4) "Board" means the board of education of any county or independent school district;
(5) "District" means any school district as defined by law;
Page 1 of 12
XXXX 2/4/2026 6:36 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2070
(6) "Elementary school" means a school consisting of the primary school program
through grade eight (8) as defined in KRS 158.030, or any appropriate combination
of grades within this range, as determined by the plan of organization for schools
authorized by the district board;
(7) "Eligible child" means for preschool education programs, a child who is:
(a) Four (4) years of age by August 1; or
(b) Three (3) or four (4) years of age with a disability in accordance with the
Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. sec. 1400 et seq.
(8) "Experience" means employment as a teacher, other than as a substitute or nursery
school teacher, for a minimum of one hundred forty (140) days during a school year
in a public or nonpublic elementary or secondary school or college or university
that is approved by the public accrediting authority in the state in which the
teaching duties were performed. A teacher who is employed by a board for at least
one hundred forty (140) days of a school year and who performs teaching duties for
the equivalent of at least seventy (70) full school days during that school year,
regardless of the schedule on which those duties were performed, shall be credited
with one (1) year of experience. A teacher who is employed by a board for at least
one hundred forty (140) days during each of two (2) school years and who performs
teaching duties for the equivalent of at least seventy (70) full school days during
those years shall be credited with one (1) year of experience. No more than one (1)
year of experience shall be credited for the performance of teaching duties during a
single school year;
(9)[(8)] "Kindergarten full-time equivalent pupil in average daily attendance" means
each kindergarten pupil counted no more than one-half (1/2) day in the aggregate
days attended by kindergarten pupils in a public school divided by the actual
number of days school is in session after the five (5) days with the lowest
attendance have been deducted. Kindergarten is the entry level of the primary
Page 2 of 12
XXXX 2/4/2026 6:36 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2070
program and shall be provided no less than the equivalent of one-half (1/2) day, five
(5) days a week for a full school year for each kindergarten pupil;
(10)[(9)] "Middle school" means a school consisting of grades five (5) through eight (8)
or any appropriate combination of grades as determined by the plan of organization
for schools authorized by the district board;
(11)[(10)] "National board certification salary supplement" means an annual supplement
added for the life of the certificate to the base salary of a teacher who attains
national board certification;
(12)[(11)] "Percentage of attendance" means the aggregate days attended by pupils in a
public school for the school year divided by the aggregate days' membership of
pupils in a public school for the school year;
(13)[(12)] "Public school fund" means the fund created by KRS 157.330 for use in
financing education in public elementary and secondary schools;
(14)[(13)] "Secondary school" means a school consisting of grades seven (7) through
twelve (12), or any appropriate combination of grades within this range as
determined by the plan of organization for schools authorized by the district board.
When grades seven (7) through nine (9) or ten (10) are organized separately as a
junior high school, or grades ten (10) through twelve (12) are organized separately
as a senior high school and are conducted in separate school plant facilities, each
shall be considered a separate secondary school for the purposes of KRS 157.310 to
157.440;
(15)[(14)] "Single salary schedule" means a schedule adopted by a local board from
which all teachers are paid for one hundred eighty-five (185) days and is based on
training, experience, and such other factors as the Kentucky Board of Education
may approve and which does not discriminate between salaries paid elementary and
secondary teachers. If the budget bill contains a minimum statewide salary
schedule, no teacher shall be paid less than the amount specified in the biennial
Page 3 of 12
XXXX 2/4/2026 6:36 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2070
budget salary schedule for the individual teacher's educational qualifications and
experience;
(16)[(15)] "Support Education Excellence in Kentucky" means the level of educational
services and facilities which is to be provided in each district from the public school
fund;
(17)[(16)] "Teacher" means any regular or special teacher, principal, supervisor,
superintendent, assistant superintendent, librarian, director of pupil personnel, or
other member of the teaching or professional staff engaged in the service of the
public elementary and secondary school for whom certification is required as a
condition of employment;
(18)[(17)] "Teaming partner" means a nongovernmental entity that contracts with a
school district to provide preschool education programs to eligible children in a
nonresidential setting;
(19) "Virtual program" means a program offered by a public school district in which all
courses in the program are virtual, do not include regular in-person instruction, and
are designed as an alternative to traditional in-person school programs; and
(20)[(18)] "Weather-related low attendance day" means a school day on which the
district's attendance falls below the average daily attendance for the prior year due
to inclement weather. The district shall submit a request to substitute the prior
year's average daily attendance for its attendance on up to ten (10) designated days,
along with documentation that the low attendance was due to inclement weather,
for approval by the commissioner of education in accordance with Kentucky Board
of Education administrative regulations.
Section 2. KRS 157.3175 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Until the end of the 2033-2034 school year, each local school district shall
ensure that a developmentally appropriate half-day preschool education
program is provided for each child who:[ is at risk of educational failure and
Page 4 of 12
XXXX 2/4/2026 6:36 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2070
who ]
1. Is four (4) years of age [:
(a) By October 1, for any year prior to 2017; or
(b) ]by August 1; and
2. Resides in a household with an income at or below one hundred sixty
percent (160%) of the federal poverty level[, for 2017 or any year
thereafter].
All other four (4) year old children shall be served to the extent placements are
available.
(b) No later than July 1, 2034, each local school district shall ensure that a
developmentally appropriate half-day preschool education program is
provided for each eligible child as defined in Section 1 of this Act. Prior to
the 2034-2035 school year, each local school district may elect to ensure
that a developmentally appropriate half-day preschool education program is
provided for each eligible child as defined in Section 1 of this Act.
(2) The Kentucky Board of Education, upon the recommendation of the chief state
school officer, shall adopt administrative regulations establishing the guidelines for
the program. The program guidelines established shall be applicable to all
providers of preschool education programs and services pursuant to this section,
including teaming partners. The guidelines shall include:
(a) Enrollment eligibility criteria;
(b) Minimum class sizes and staff-to-child ratio;
(c) Standards for personnel;
(d) The minimum number of hours and days programs shall operate;
(e) Standards for curriculum that are aligned with Kentucky's Early Childhood
Standards;
(f) Standards for ensuring enrolled children are kindergarten ready;
Page 5 of 12
XXXX 2/4/2026 6:36 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2070
(g) Requirements for facilities, safety, health, and transportation;
(h) Processes for the collection and reporting of data necessary to implement
subsection (3) of this section;
(i) Guidance for local school districts providing preschool education programs
or services in collaboration with teaming partners; and
(j) Any other guidelines necessary to provide developmentally appropriate
preschool education programs or services or to implement the provisions of
this section.
(3) (a) The Kentucky Department of Education shall establish and maintain a
statewide unified data system for all preschool education program
providers.
(b) Providers shall collect and submit to the department on an annual basis
enrollment, quality, workforce, and student success data.
(c) By November 1 of each year, the department shall publish the data to a
public website designated for that purpose[Administrative regulations shall
establish eligibility criteria, program guidelines, and standards for personnel].
(4)[(2)] "Developmentally appropriate preschool program" means a program which
focuses on the physical, intellectual, social, and emotional development of young
children. The preschool program shall help children with their interpersonal and
socialization skills.
(5)[(3)] Funds appropriated by the General Assembly for the preschool education
programs shall be granted to local school districts according to a grant allotment
system approved by the Kentucky Board of Education. [Children who are at risk
shall be identified based on the Federal School Lunch Program eligibility criteria
for free lunch. ]Appropriations shall be separate from all other funds appropriated
to the Department of Education and shall be administered in accordance with
applicable federal and state statutes and administrative regulations. Eligible local
Page 6 of 12
XXXX 2/4/2026 6:36 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2070
school districts shall receive funds based on the average number of preschool
children being served on December 1 and March 1 of the prior academic year who
are appropriately identified as:
(a) Three (3) and four (4) years of age with disabilities; and
(b) Four (4) years of age[ identified as at risk of educational failure].
Local school districts may develop cooperative arrangements with other school
districts or organizations in accordance with KRS 157.280.
(6)[(4)] A child shall be eligible for a free and appropriate preschool education and
related services if:
(a) 1. The child has been identified as a child with a disability in accordance
with the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C.
sec.[secs.] 1400 et seq.; or
2. The child has been identified in accordance with the definitions and
procedures for exceptional children and youth in accordance with KRS
157.200(1)(a) to (m); and
(b) The child is three (3) or four (4) years of age[:
1. By October 1, for any year before 2017; or
2. ] by August 1[, for 2017 or any year thereafter].
(7)[(5)] The chief state school officer shall receive and review proposals from local
school districts for grants to operate or oversee the operation of developmentally
appropriate preschool education programs. Districts may submit proposals for
implementing new services, enhancing existing preschool education services, or
contracting for services. In designing a local early childhood education program,
each district shall work with existing preschool programs to avoid duplication of
programs and services, to avoid supplanting federal funds, and to maximize Head
Start funds in order to serve as many four (4) year old children as possible.
(8)[(6)] Each program proposal shall include, at a minimum:
Page 7 of 12
XXXX 2/4/2026 6:36 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2070
(a) A description of the process conducted by the district to ensure that the
parents or guardians of all eligible participants have been made aware of the
program and of their right to participate;
(b) A description of the planned educational programming and related services;
(c) The estimated number of children participating in the program;
(d) Strategies for involving children with disabilities;
(e) Estimated ratio of staff to children with the maximum being one (1) adult for
each ten (10) children;
(f) The estimated percentage of children participating in the program who are at
risk[ of educational failure];
(g) Information on the training and qualifications of program staff and
documentation that the staff meet required standards;
(h) A budget and per-child expenditure estimate;
(i) A plan to facilitate active parental involvement in the preschool program,
including provisions for complementary parent education when appropriate;
(j) Facilities and equipment which are appropriate for young children;
(k) The days of the week and hours of a day during which the program shall
operate;
(l) A plan for coordinating the program with existing medical and social services,
including a child development and health screening component;
(m) Assurances that participants shall receive breakfast or lunch;
(n) Program sites which meet state and local licensure requirements;
(o) A plan for coordinating program philosophy and activities with the local
district's primary school program;
(p) An evaluation component; and
(q) Certification from the local Head Start director that the Head Start program is
fully utilized pursuant to subsection (7)[(4)] of this section.
Page 8 of 12
XXXX 2/4/2026 6:36 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2070
(9)[(7)] If the superintendent and local Head Start director are unable to reach an
agreement on whether a Head Start program is fully utilized, the superintendent or
local Head Start director shall notify the chief state school officer. The local Head
Start director shall provide the chief state school officer all information relevant to
the utilization of the Head Start program. Within thirty (30) days of notification
from the superintendent or local Head Start director, the chief state school officer
shall make a determination of whether a Head Start program is fully utilized and
may execute the certification required by subsection (8)(q)[(6)(q)] of this section on
behalf of the local Head Start director.
(10)[(8)] Programs shall reflect an equitable geographic distribution representative of
all areas of the Commonwealth.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 157 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) To increase preschool enrollment eligibility, each local school district shall work
with Head Start and other existing preschool programs to avoid duplication of
services and programs, to avoid supplanting federal funds, and to maximize Head
Start funds in order to serve as many four (4) year old children as possible, and
shall maintain certification from the Head Start director that the Head Start
program is fully utilized. If a local school district fails to comply with the
requirements of this subsection, the commissioner of education shall withhold
preschool funding for an amount equal to the number of Head Start-eligible
children served in the district who would have been eligible to be served by Head
Start under the full utilization certification required under this subsection. The
commissioner of education shall resolve any disputes and make a determination
of the district's compliance with the full utilization requirement.
(2) By March 1, 2028, a local school district shall prepare and submit a preschool
expansion plan to the Kentucky Department of Education for review and
Page 9 of 12
XXXX 2/4/2026 6:36 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2070
approval. Preschool expansion plans may include:
(a) The estimated school year when expansion will begin;
(b) The existing number of preschool students as of the date of plan
submission;
(c) The anticipated number of seats needed to enroll all four (4) year old
children in the district;
(d) The identification of any anticipated implementation and compliance
issues;
(e) A statement of intent regarding use of teaming partners for implementation;
(f) Any infrastructure and facility needs;
(g) Any transportation concerns;
(h) Any space or capacity concerns;
(i) Any anticipated facility, transportation, personnel, or other waivers needed
for expansion implementation, if any; and
(j) Any additional information as required by the department.
(3) (a) By December 1, 2027, the department shall promulgate administrative
regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to establish:
1. Procedures for school districts to submit preschool expansion
implementation plans to the department for review and approval;
2. Procedures and requirements for school districts to contract with
teaming partners to provide preschool education programs or services
for eligible children;
3. Requirements for school districts to proceed with preschool expansion
without the use of teaming partners, including documentation
certifying that teaming partners do not exist in the school district,
cannot meet the requirements of the program guidelines established in
administrative regulation, or choose not to participate;
Page 10 of 12
XXXX 2/4/2026 6:36 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2070
4. Procedures for school districts to submit preschool expansion program
waivers to the department for review and approval;
5. Procedures for a school district to apply for preschool expansion
funds following submission and approval of its preschool expansion
plan, including the creation of a uniform application form and
application review guidelines;
6. Procedures for review and approval of a school district’s application
for preschool expansion funds;
7. Procedures and criteria to be used by the department to distribute
preschool expansion funds to approved school districts through a
grant allotment system; and
8. Any additional administrative regulations necessary to effectuate this
section.
(b) When promulgating administrative regulations under this section, the
department shall consider standards and procedures that have been found
to be best practices relative to the regulation of preschool education
programs or services for children.
(4) By December 1, 2028, and each year thereafter, the department shall submit a
report to the Legislative Research Commission regarding preschool expansion for
referral to the appropriate Interim Joint Committee on Education. The purpose
of the annual report is to guide the General Assembly in expanding preschool
access in a phased and responsible manner. The report submitted by the
department shall include:
(a) A summary of the information provided by local school districts in their
respective preschool expansion plans;
(b) An assessment of:
1. The current state of preschool education programs or services in the
Page 11 of 12
XXXX 2/4/2026 6:36 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2070
Commonwealth of Kentucky; and
2. The ability of four (4) year old children in all areas of the state to
access preschool education programs or services;
(c) Any recommendations for the continued expansion of preschool access in
the Commonwealth of Kentucky;
(d) Any recommended additions or revisions to this chapter; and
(e) Any other data or information requested by the Legislative Research
Commission relating to the preschool education programs or services and
this chapter.
(5) The General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky recognizes the
importance of preschool education programs for children. It is the intent of the
General Assembly to expand access to preschool education and services to all
four (4) year old children in the Commonwealth of Kentucky, and such
expansion shall occur in a phased and responsible manner based on program
enrollment growth and available funding.
Page 12 of 12
XXXX 2/4/2026 6:36 PM Jacketed